Vermont, session 2025-2026, H693.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the amendments to the charter of the Town
of Bennington as set forth in this act. The voters approved the proposal of
amendment on March 4, 2025.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 103 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 103. TOWN OF BENNINGTON
* * *
VT LEG #382565 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.693
2026 Page 2 of 2
§ 303. FURTHER POWERS OF SELECT BOARD MEMBERS
In addition to powers otherwise conferred by law, the Select Board
members shall also have the power to:
* * *
(7) discharge all duties heretofore devolving on the Town Agent by
general law and hire attorneys on behalf of the Town; and
(8) establish an adequate number of polling places within the Town as
required for the convenience of the Town voters and without regard to election
district boundaries, to the end that election expenses may be lessened and
confusion among the voters as to the proper place for them to vote may be
avoided; however, one such polling place shall be in North Bennington and the
central polling place shall be within the boundaries of the former Village of
Bennington; and
(9) delegate the responsibility to review video footage, transcripts, and
other materials following an investigation of a complaint against the police
department to the existing Community Policing Advisory Review Board or to
another board established by the Select Board to replace the Community
Policing Advisory Review Board.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #382565 v.1